Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201882-137
Willa Cather; legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(1) Willa Cather is a significant historical and literary figure of Nebraska;

(2) There exist many Cather-related properties in Webster County that provide irreplaceable historical value to the ongoing interpretation of the significance of Cather;

(3) These properties also spur economic activity by means of national and international tourism and annual literary conferences; and

(4) It is the intent of the Legislature to preserve these properties for future generations.

Laws 2018, LB379, § 1.
April 5, 2018